hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 zar		 cé		trizar
SFX V		 zar		 cé		tualizar
SFX V		 zar		 ce		ualizar
SFX V		 zar		 ce		ularizar
SFX V		 zar		 cé		uralizar
SFX V		 zar		 cé		urizar
SFX V		 zar		 ce		uzar
SFX V		 zar		 ce		vilizar
SFX V		 zar		 ce		zar
SFX V		 zar		 za		acionalizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		aguazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		aizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		alizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		alzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		anizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		atizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		autorizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		bozar
SFX V		 zar		 za		calizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		calzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		canizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		chazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		cializar
SFX V		 zar		 za		cionalizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		cizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		colonizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		cotizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		dazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		derezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		dramatizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		embozar
SFX V		 zar		 za		emorizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		emplazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		encolerizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		enjaezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		entalizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		erezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		erizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ernizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		etizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		galizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		gularizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ializar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ilizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		inizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		izar
SFX V		 zar		 za		jaezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		larizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		latinizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		lazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		lcanizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		lizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		lzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		magnetizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		manizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		matizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		mentalizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		movilizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		nalizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		neralizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		nizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		nzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ocratizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		olizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		onizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		orizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		otizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ozar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ralizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		rezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		rizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		rnizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		rtizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ruzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		stezar
SFX V		 zar		 za		talizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		tazar
SFX V		 zar		 za		tilizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		tizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		torizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		trizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		tualizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		ularizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		uralizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		uzar
SFX V		 zar		 za		vilizar
SFX V		 zar		 za		zar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		abazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		aguazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		aguazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		aizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		alizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		alizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		anizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		anizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		antizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		anzar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		arizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		atizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		autorizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		azar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		azar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		balizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		bazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		bazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		calzar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		canizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		cializar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		cionalizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		comenzar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		cularizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		dazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		dizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		dramatizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		elazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		elizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ematizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		embozar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		emnizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		enazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		encolerizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		enjaezar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		enzar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		erizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		erizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ernizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		etizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ezar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ezar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		guazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ializar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ilizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ilizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		inizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		italizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		izar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		izar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		jaezar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		larizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		larizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		lazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		lerizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		lizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		lizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		logizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		magnetizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		manizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		matizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		matizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		mazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		minalizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		mizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		movilizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		nalizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		nalizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		naturalizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		nazar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ngazar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		nizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		nizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ntizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ocratizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		olarizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		olizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		orizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		orizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		orzar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		otizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		porizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ralizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ranzar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		retozar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		rializar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		rizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		rizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		rnizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		talizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		talizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ternizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		tezar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		tizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		trizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		tronzar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		tualizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		ualizar
SFX V		 zar		 zó		ularizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		uzar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		vilizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		vorizar
SFX V		 zar		 zo		zar
