hunspell/spanish.dic
abarbetar/V
aberenjenar/V
abolir/V
abromar/V
abstuvr/V
acalorar/V
acarrasar/V
acerrojar/V
aciberar/V
acoitar/V
acordelar/V
acreditar/V
acuchar/V
adentrar/V
adoptar/V
adunar/V
afiliar/V
agarrotar/V
agraviar/V
aguardar/V
ahijarar/V
air/V
alagar/V
alcalizar/V
alerger/V
algaler/V
alisar/V
almenar/V
altear/V
amagar/V
ambientar/V
amnistiar/V
amorecer/V
amueblar/V
andar/V
animalizar/V
antegrear/V
antistrofar/V
apabullar/V
apar/V
apernar/V
aplanar/V
aporcar/V
aprisionar/V
aquerenciar/V
arenacear/V
aromar/V
arregostar/V
arridar/V
arruar/V
ascender/V
asibilar/V
asquear/V
atacamitar/V
atapascar/V
atener/V
atoar/V
atronerar/V
autentificar/V
avalorar/V
avizorar/V
azorar/V
bachillerear/V
balbucir/V
bambalear/V
barbullar/V
bar/V
batir/V
belísonar/V
bestsellir/V
bienquistar/V
bisbiseer/V
blanquizar/V
boicotear/V
bordar/V
brandir/V
brincar/V
buar/V
burocratizar/V
cablear/V
caducar/V
calatravar/V
callear/V
camillar/V
cancillir/V
caparar/V
caracterir/V
carácterir/V
carnificar/V
cascajar/V
catar/V
cavar/V
cegajar/V
cendrar/V
cerchar/V
cespitar/V
chalupar/V
charabañar/V
chercañar/V
chiquitiñir/V
chozpar/V
ciclopear/V
cintar/V
circunvalar/V
clar/V
cáncar/V
cochear/V
coger/V
colgar/V
comadrear/V
comnzar/V
competirar/V
comprasar/V
conceptualizar/V
concurrir/V
confeccionar/V
conglomerar/V
conocer/V
constrener/V
contestar/V
contradier/V
contramarchar/V
contraventanar/V
conviver/V
copular/V
cornacar/V
corresponder/V
cosiar/V
crepitar/V
cristianizar/V
cruzastar/V
cuartear/V
cuchillar/V
cultalatiniparlar/V
cuspidar/V
debar/V
decepcionar/V
defenestrar/V
degollar/V
demodular/V
denunciar/V
derivar/V
desabrar/V
desacoplar/V
desaguisar/V
desalinizar/V
desanduvir/V
desaprobar/V
desasar/V
desatollar/V
desbarnizar/V
descabalar/V
descarar/V
descendar/V
descobajar/V
descompensar/V
descontaminar/V
descoyuntar/V
descruzásar/V
desellar/V
desempañar/V
desenamorar/V
desencordelar/V
desengoznar/V
desenrollar/V
desentumer/V
desfaciar/V
desgasar/V
deshechacer/V
desimanar/V
deslastrar/V
desmadejar/V
desmayar/V
desmolerar/V
desojar/V
despaldar/V
despechugar/V
despernar/V
despizar/V
desprestigiar/V
desrielar/V
destenir/V
destripar/V
desunzar/V
desvitalizar/V
detergentar/V
devastarar/V
diaprear/V
diferir/V
diligenciar/V
dirimentar/V
discutar/V
disintir/V
distracir/V
dizar/V
domiciliar/V
dramaturgir/V
ebenacear/V
ejercitar/V
elucidar/V
embalsar/V
embaucar/V
embobezar/V
embovedar/V
embutar/V
empampar/V
empeñar/V
empezar/V
empolvorar/V
emulsionar/V
enar/V
encallar/V
encaprichar/V
encastar/V
encespedar/V
enclavarar/V
enconar/V
encrespadar/V
encurener/V
enemistadir/V
enflaquecer/V
engabar/V
engastar/V
engrandecer/V
enhenar/V
enjutezar/V
enlosar/V
enmondar/V
enredar/V
enroscar/V
ensangrentar/V
ensnar/V
entapujar/V
entorchar/V
entredecer/V
entretejar/V
entrojar/V
enuclear/V
enver/V
enzarzar/V
erigir/V
escacher/V
escaparatar/V
escarranchar/V
escorar/V
escudar/V
esforcir/V
espalar/V
espermatorrear/V
espumajar/V
estabular/V
estentorear/V
estipulir/V
estregar/V
estufar/V
europeizar/V
excelenterer/V
exiliar/V
expidir/V
expulsar/V
extraar/V
extraviar/V
falazar/V
fanfarroñar/V
fatimiar/V
fermer/V
filetear/V
fintar/V
fletar/V
flysch/V
fortificar/V
fraccionar/V
fregar/V
frisonar/V
fuercer/V
fustar/V
gallofear/V
garantizar/V
garrotinar/V
gemipar/V
gibar/V
globalizar/V
golosinear/V
grafilar/V
gratiñir/V
gruñir/V
gualdrapear/V
guatear/V
gustar/V
haldar/V
hartar/V
hender/V
herronar/V
hidrogrosular/V
hipar/V
homar/V
horar/V
hover/V
humedecer/V
idar/V
imbunchar/V
impir/V
improvisar/V
incautarar/V
incomunicabilidar/V
incumplir/V
ineducar/V
informatizar/V
ingir/V
inmiscüir/V
inquietar/V
insolntar/V
intencionar/V
internar/V
intimedir/V
intubar/V
invistir/V
irrír/V
jabir/V
jaquelar/V
jirafar/V
juegar/V
kieselguhr/V
lactear/V
lamelibranquir/V
lanudar/V
latinar/V
laxistir/V
leonar/V
álgir/V
ligar/V
linerar/V
liturgir/V
länder/V
lápadar/V
lumiñar/V
macollar/V
magdaleonar/V
malbaratar/V
malhirar/V
mampar/V
mangar/V
manufacturar/V
marear/V
marítimar/V
matrimoner/V
mecer/V
melonar/V
mercar/V
metallar/V
microaglomerar/V
mimar/V
miriar/V
modorrar/V
moliar/V
monocytoger/V
morber/V
motear/V
mítiñir/V
multar/V
musear/V
nacer/V
negar/V
neviscar/V
nitrogenar/V
nornoroestar/V
numerar/V
oblicuar/V
obstruir/V
ofender/V
olmar/V
oprober/V
oriflamar/V
ostagar/V
pacificar/V
palar/V
palpitar/V
papeletear/V
parallamar/V
parir/V
partir/V
patar/V
pausar/V
pedalear/V
pelar/V
pensionar/V
perecer/V
permanecer/V
persistenciaar/V
pestanear/V
picar/V
pillear/V
pipir/V
pitancerar/V
plañir/V
plazcar/V
plurilingar/V
polemarcar/V
pomper/V
porfiar/V
posganglionar/V
potrear/V
precaverer/V
predefenir/V
prefijarar/V
premr/V
presaturar/V
prevalecentar/V
probabilidar/V
profr/V
promedir/V
prorratear/V
protejar/V
pudelar/V
pulpar/V
quebeqsar/V
querriar/V
quintuplicar/V
raciociñar/V
rancajar/V
rasgar/V
rábir/V
reanimar/V
rebelar/V
rebuscar/V
recbar/V
recidivar/V
reconcomir/V
reconstituyésar/V
recosir/V
recuestar/V
redistribuir/V
reequilibrar/V
refractar/V
refulgerir/V
regresar/V
rehumedecer/V
rejar/V
relingar/V
remesar/V
remorder/V
reniegar/V
repeinar/V
replicar/V
repudir/V
resalir/V
resiegar/V
responder/V
retadar/V
retonecer/V
retrogradar/V
revanchar/V
revolcar/V
ribetear/V
ripiar/V
roblizar/V
romanizar/V
roznír/V
rumorar/V
saborear/V
sagar/V
salguar/V
salvaguardar/V
sangregordar/V
sar/V
secabar/V
segunder/V
semiinscribir/V
separar/V
ser/V
sextavarar/V
silabear/V
siner/V
soberber/V
sobrecoger/V
sobresiembrar/V
soecer/V
soler/V
somorgujar/V
sortigir/V
subbar/V
subordiñar/V
substrair/V
sudar/V
sulfonar/V
supersaturar/V
susodecir/V
sutar/V
tafiletear/V
tamizar/V
tarar/V
tatar/V
telenovelar/V
tenacear/V
terminotar/V
thaer/V
tinterillar/V
toar/V
toriar/V
trabasar/V
trajir/V
transfusorar/V
transterminar/V
trascordar/V
trasmiñar/V
trastear/V
travistir/V
tresdoblar/V
trinar/V
trocar/V
trufar/V
tumular/V
turnir/V
ultraaltar/V
ungir/V
ureter/V
vacuñar/V
valuar/V
vegtar/V
ventilar/V
verificar/V
vgar/V
vigoradar/V
virotar/V
váler/V
voser/V
yaraviar/V
zaher/V
zapear/V
zullar/V
